Alabama, session 2026rs, SB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) There is created within the Department
of Insurance the Office of Risk and Resilience. The office
shall develop and implement risk controls to help promote and
sustain a healthy insurance market in the state and shall work
to solve issues of risk and resilience facing the insurance
market.
(b) The Commissioner of Insurance, in conformance with
Section 36-26-10, Code of Alabama 1975, may employ personnel
Page 1

Section 36-26-10, Code of Alabama 1975, may employ personnel
SB308 INTRODUCED
to operate the office including one employee who is in the
exempt service and not subject to the state Merit System. This
position is in addition to any other exempt position otherwise
authorized by law for the department. The compensation of this
employee shall be set by the commissioner.
Section 2. Section 27-31E-2 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§27-31E-2
(a) There is established within the Office of Risk and
Resilience of the Department of Insurance, the Strengthen
Alabama Homes Program.
(b) There is established the Strengthen Alabama Homes
Fund within the State Treasury for the use of the department
to administer the program.
(c) This chapter does not create an entitlement for
property owners or obligate the state in any way to fund the
inspection or retrofitting of residential property in this
state. Implementation of this program is subject to annual
legislative appropriations, receipt of federal grants or
funds, or receipt of other sources of grants or funds. The
department shall use its best efforts to obtain grants or
funds from the federal government or other funding sources to
supplement the financial resources of the program that may be
provided by the state.
(d) Monies in the program shall be deposited in the
Strengthen Alabama Homes Fund. Monies shall not lapse, unless
otherwise specified under federal funding or a federal grant,
or a grant or funds from another source, or be transferred to
Page 2

or a grant or funds from another source, or be transferred to
SB308 INTRODUCED
the General Fund or other state funds and shall not be
redistributed. Monies shall be used for the purpose of
assisting the program in performing all acts that relate to
the function and purpose of the program.
(e) The program shall apply for financial grants to
retrofit insurable property as defined in Section 27-31D-3, to
resist loss due to hurricane, tornado, or other catastrophic
windstorm events as prescribed in subsection (b) of Section
27-31D-2(b).
(f) The program may also make grants or funding
available to nonprofit entities for projects to retrofit an
insurable property to resist loss due to hurricane, tornado,
or other catastrophic windstorm events if such grants or
funding to nonprofit entities are allowable under grant or
funding rules, requirements, guidelines, or criteria. However,
a nonprofit entity shall agree to administer the grants or
funds as the program would be required to administer grants or
funds and the entity shall provide documentation to the
department in a timely manner as requested by the department.
(g) All mitigation shall be based upon the securing of
all required local permits and applicable inspections in
keeping with local building codes and the Fortified for
Existing Homes Program. Mitigation projects are subject to
random reinspection of all projects.
(h) The department may promulgate adopt rules and
eligibility requirements necessary for the proper
administration of this chapter and pursuant to any
instructions or requirements on grants or funds funding
Page 3

instructions or requirements on grants or funds funding
SB308 INTRODUCED
received by the program."
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 4